Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.210

Inventory of county capitalized assets.

Each board of county commissioners of the several counties of the state of Washington shall file with the auditor of the county a full and complete inventory of all capitalized assets kept in accordance with standards established by the state auditor.

[ 2017 c 37 s 1; 2003 c 53 s 204; 1997 c 245 s 3; 1995 c 194 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 182 s 2; 1963 c 108 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.32.210. Prior: 1931 c 95 s 1; RRS s 4056-1. FORMER PARTS OF SECTION: (i) 1931 c 95 s 2; RRS s 4056-2, now codified as RCW 36.32.213. (ii) 1931 c 95 s 3; RRS s 4056-3, now codified as RCW 36.32.215.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

State building code: Chapter 19.27 RCW.